Hawaii, session 2025, HB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Hawaii-Ireland trade commission; established; membership; duties.  (a)  There is established within the department, for administrative purposes only, the Hawaii-Ireland trade commission.  The commission shall consist of eleven members who shall be appointed as follows: (1)  Five members to be appointed by the governor without regard to section 26-34; (2)  Three members to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and (3)  Three members to be appointed by the president of the senate. Each member shall be appointed for a four-year term; provided that each member shall hold office until reappointed by the member's respective appointing authority at the end of the member's term or until the member's successor is appointed.  Any vacancy shall be filled by the respective appointing authority. All initial appointments shall be made no later than October 1, 2025. (b)  The members of the commission shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among themselves. (c)  Any action taken by the commission shall be approved by a simple majority of its members. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum to do business. (d) Each member of the commission shall have: (1)  Knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations that promote Irish affairs; or (2)  An interest in the well-being of trade relations between Hawaii and Ireland. (e)  The commission shall: (1)  Advance bilateral trade and investment between Hawaii and Ireland; (2)  Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to Hawaii and Ireland; (3)  Promote business and academic exchanges between Hawaii and Ireland; (4)  Encourage mutual economic support between Hawaii and Ireland; (5)  Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of Hawaii and Ireland; and (6)  Address any other issues as determined by the commission. (f)  Beginning with the regular session of 2027, no later than twenty days before the convening of each regular session, the commission shall submit to the legislature and governor a report of its work during the previous year. (g) The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses, including travel expenses, reasonably incurred in the performance of their official duties. (h) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section. (i)  As used in this section, "commission" means the Hawaii-Ireland trade commission." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $75,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to fund out-of-state relations activities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.